Nebraska, session 109, LB335.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 85-2303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-2303 For purposes of the In the Line of Duty Dependent Education Act:
(1) Associate degree program means a degree program at a community
college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion
of an organized program of study of at least sixty semester credit hours or an
equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal. Associate degree
program does not include a baccalaureate degree program;
(2) Baccalaureate degree program means a degree program at a community
college, state college, or state university which typically requires completion
of an organized program of study of at least one hundred twenty semester credit
hours or an equivalent that can be shown to accomplish the same goal;
(3) Child means a resident or nonresident of Nebraska who is the child by
birth or adoption or the stepchild of a Nebraska law enforcement officer killed
in the line of duty or a Nebraska firefighter killed in the line of duty;
(4) Community college means a public postsecondary educational institution
which is part of the community college system and includes all branches and
campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
(5) Education benefit means the In the Line of Duty Dependent Education
Benefit established under section 85-2304;
(6) Fatal injury means an event occurring in the line of duty which is a
proximate cause of the death of a law enforcement officer or firefighter;
(7) Firefighter means a member of a paid or volunteer fire department in
Nebraska, including a member of a rescue squad associated with a paid or
volunteer fire department in Nebraska, and a member of an emergency medical
services ambulance squad;
(8) Law enforcement officer means any person who is responsible for the
prevention or detection of crime or the enforcement of the penal, traffic, or
highway laws of the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision of the state
for more than one hundred hours per year and who is authorized by law to make
arrests;
(9) Line of duty means any action that a Nebraska law enforcement officer
or firefighter is authorized or obligated by law, rule, or regulation to
perform, related to or as a condition of employment or service;
(10) State college means a public postsecondary educational institution
which is part of the Nebraska state college system and includes all branches
and campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
(11) State university means a public postsecondary educational institution
which is part of the University of Nebraska and includes all branches and
campuses of such institution located within the State of Nebraska;
(12) Tuition and fees means the charges and cost of tuition and fees as
set by the governing body of a state university, state college, or community
college; and
(13) Volunteer fire department means a volunteer department as defined in
section 35-1303 located in Nebraska which provides fire protection services
within Nebraska.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-2303, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-